Hawaii statutes.
§235-29 Apportionment of business income;
percentage. All business income shall be apportioned to this State by
multiplying the income by a fraction, the numerator of which is the property
factor plus the payroll factor plus the sales factor, and the denominator of
which is three. [L 1967, c 33, pt of §1; HRS §235-29]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next